Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-598
Sections; how construed.

Except as otherwise provided in section 86-595, nothing in sections 86-593 to 86-598 shall be construed
to restrict or expand any authority of a public power supplier as that authority
existed prior to September 4, 2005.

Laws 2005, LB 645, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB658, § 2.
July 18, 2014